Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. Bee Diseases.

§ 69-25-101.
Shipment of bees into State; requirement of certificate or permit.

All honey bees shipped or moved into the State of Mississippi shall be accompanied by a certificate of inspection signed by the State Entomologist, State Apiary Inspector or corresponding official of the state or country from which such bees are shipped or moved. Such certificate shall certify to the apparent freedom of the bees and their combs and hives, from contagious and infectious diseases and parasites and must be based upon an actual inspection of the bees themselves within a period of sixty (60) days preceding the date of shipment; provided, that when honey bees are to be shipped into this state from other states or countries wherein no official apiary inspector or State Entomologist is available, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce may issue permit for such shipment upon presentation of suitable evidence showing such bees to be free from disease. The provisions of this section shall not apply to shipments of live bees in wire cages, when without combs of honey.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3636b; 1930, § 6979; 1942, § 5001; Laws, 1920, ch. 209; Laws, 1972, ch. 369, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 329, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 69-25-103.
Department of Agriculture and Commerce empowered to deal with Africanized bees and bee diseases.

The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall have full and plenary power to deal with Africanized honey bees (Apris mellifera scutellata) and with American and European foul brood, and all other contagious or infectious diseases and parasites of honey bees which, in its opinion, may be prevented, controlled or eradicated; and shall have full power and is hereby authorized to make, promulgate and enforce such rules, ordinances and regulations and to perform such acts, through its agents or otherwise, as in its judgment may be necessary to control, eradicate or prevent the introduction, spread or dissemination of Africanized honey bees and all contagious diseases of honey bees and parasites as far as may be possible and all such rules, ordinances and regulations of said department shall have the force and effect of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3636c; 1930, § 6980; 1942, § 5002; Laws, 1920, ch. 209; Laws, 1972, ch. 369, § 4; Laws, 1991, ch. 329, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 69-25-105.
Authority to make inspections and to order removal, destruction or treatment of Africanized or infected bees.

The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, its agents and employees, shall have authority to enter any depot, express office, storeroom, warehouse or premises for the purpose of inspecting any honey bees or beekeeping fixtures or appliances therein or thought to be therein, for the purpose of ascertaining whether said bees or fixtures are infected with any contagious or infectious disease or parasite or which they may have reason to believe are Africanized bees or have been or are being transported in violation of any of the provisions of this article.

The said department through its agents or employees may require the removal from this state of any honey bees or beekeeping fixtures which have been brought into the state in violation of the provisions of this article, or if finding any honey bees or fixtures infected with any contagious or infectious disease or parasite or if finding that such bees are Africanized or if such bees or fixtures have been exposed to danger of infection by such diseases, may require the destruction, treatment or disinfection of such infected or exposed bees, hives, fixtures or appliances.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3636d; 1930, § 6981; 1942, § 5003; Laws, 1920, ch. 209; Laws, 1972, ch. 369, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 329, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 69-25-107.
Shipment of suspected materials may be prohibited.

The shipment or movement into this state of any used or secondhand beehives, honey combs, frames or other beekeeping fixtures is hereby prohibited except under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3636e; 1930, § 6982; 1942, § 5004; Laws, 1920, ch. 209; Laws, 1972, ch. 369, § 6; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 69-25-109.
Penalty for violations of this article.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this article or of the rules or regulations of the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, adopted in accordance with the provisions thereof shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months in the county jail.

In addition to the criminal penalty imposed under subsection (1) of this section, each violation of this article or the applicable rules and regulations established by the commissioner pertaining hereto shall subject the violator to administrative action as provided in Sections 69-25-51 through 69-25-63.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3636f; 1930, § 6983; 1942, § 5005; Laws, 1920, ch. 209; Laws, 1972, ch. 369, § 7; Laws, 1991, ch. 530, § 24; Laws, 2012, ch. 502, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2012.